ru: Совместимый бренд адаптера: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Другое
fr: Marque d’adaptateur compatible: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Autre
zh-CN: 适配适配器品牌: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; 其他
sv: Kompatibla adaptermärken: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Övrigt
bg-BG: Марка на съвместимия адаптер: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Друго
vi: Thương hiệu bộ chuyển đổi tương thích: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Khác
fi: Yhteensopiva brändi: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Muu
nb: Kompatibel adapter merkevare: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Annet
lt-LT: Suderinamas adapterio prekės ženklas: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Kita
pt-PT: Marca do adaptador compatível: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Outro
de: Kompatible Adaptermarke: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Sonstige
es: Marca de adaptador compatible: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Otro
zh-TW: 相容轉接器品牌: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; 其他
ja: 互換性のあるアダプターブランド: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; その他
el: Επωνυμία συμβατού προσαρμογέα: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Άλλο
hu: Kompatibilis adaptermárka: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Egyéb
ko: 호환 어댑터 브랜드: 캘러웨이; 클리브랜드; 코브라; 미즈노; PXG; 핑; 스릭슨; 테일러메이드; 타이틀리스트; 윌슨; 젝시오; 기타
pl: Kompatybilna marka adaptera: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Inna
nl: Compatibel adaptermerk: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Overige
it: branddell'adattatore compatibile: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Altro
cs: Značka kompatibilního adaptéru: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Ostatní
tr: Uyumlu adaptör markası: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Diğer
pt-BR: Marca de adaptador compatível: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Outro
sk-SK: Značka kompatibilného adaptéra: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Iné
en: Compatible adapter brand: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Other
da: Kompatibelt adaptermærke: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Andet
sl-SI: Blagovna znamka združljivega adapterja: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Drugo
ro-RO: Marcă adaptor compatibil: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Altele
hr-HR: Kompatibilna marka prilagodnika: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; Ostalo
th: แบรนด์อะแดปเตอร์ที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: Callaway; Cleveland; Cobra; Mizuno; PXG; Ping; Srixon; TaylorMade; Titleist; Wilson; XXIO; อื่นๆ